South Dakota, session 2026, SB132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 1-46A-5 be AMENDED:
1-46A-5. The Department of Veterans Affairs shall consult with the South Dakota
Veterans Council on a biannual basis regarding matters related to veterans and their
dependents. The council shall provide recommendations to the department on budgets,
legislation, policies, and programs affecting veterans of this state and their dependents.
The South Dakota Veterans Council consists of one representative of each of the
following:
(1) The American Legion;
(2) Disabled American Veterans;
(3) Military Order of the Purple Heart of the United States of America;
(4) National American Indian Veterans;
(5) Paralyzed Veterans of America;
(6) Veterans of Foreign Wars of the United States; and
(7) Vietnam Veterans of America, chapters 1054 and 959.

26.249.26 2 132
An Act to modify provisions related to the South Dakota Veterans Council.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 132
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 132 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB132 ENROLLED